Hawaii, session 2025, SB1176.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that while no other state has established an official computer language, Hawaii recognizes the significant role that computer science, software development, and other STEM-related fields play in fostering innovation, economic development, and educational advancement.  By designating an official computer language, Hawaii seeks to raise awareness and encourage participation in these fields, especially by the youth of the State. The legislature further finds that while other computer languages may merit consideration, Python, a universally adopted programming language, has become integral to modern technological innovation.  The legislature recognizes that Python is widely used in diverse applications such as artificial intelligence, machine learning, data analytics, web development, and chatbot programming.  Its versatility, readability, and accessibility make it an ideal tool for teaching coding and developing software, even for those with no prior programming experience. Designating Python as the first official computer language of Hawaii will create new avenues for learning and inspire youth to explore careers in computer sciences and related disciplines.  Additionally, this recognition will provide increased publicity for technology enterprises in the State and position Hawaii as a forward-thinking leader in technology education and innovation.  By embracing Python, Hawaii underscores its commitment to equipping residents with the skills and knowledge necessary to thrive in the 21st-century economy. SECTION 2. Chapter 5, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding a new section to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "§5- State computer language.  Python is adopted, established, and designated as the official computer language of the State." SECTION 3.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 4.  This Act shall take effect upon its approval. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________